Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 33.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20101-162
Certified public accountant; employees
and assistants; not prohibited.

Nothing contained in the
Public Accountancy Act shall prohibit any person not a certified public accountant from
serving as an employee of, or an assistant to, a certified public accountant or partnership
or limited liability company of certified public accountants holding a permit issued
under section 1-136 or a foreign accountant exercising the temporary practice privilege under
section 1-125.02, except that such
employee or assistant shall not issue any accounting or financial statement
over his or her name.

Laws 1957, c. 1, § 57, p. 76;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 58;

Laws 1997, LB 114, § 52;

Laws 2009, LB31, § 33.